Hawaii statutes.
§571-31.1 Standard for detention. (a)
As used in this chapter, "protection of the community" means there is
a threat to, and a necessity to protect, the person or property of others from:

(1) A minor who is alleged to have committed an
offense which caused physical harm, or a threat of physical harm, to another
person; or

(2) A minor who is alleged to have committed an
offense which caused damage to, or theft of, property; and

(A) The minor's record reveals a pattern of
behavior which has caused damage to, or loss of, property; and

(B) Previous control measures have failed.

(b) As used in this chapter, "immediate
welfare" means:

(1) The minor is in physical, emotional, or
psychological danger, or may be prior to the court's disposition;

(2) No parent or other responsible adult known to the
decision-maker is willing and able to provide the type and degree of
supervision necessary to protect the minor from that danger;

(3) No other secure facility is appropriate and
available.

(c) In determining whether the immediate
welfare or the protection of the community requires a minor's detention, an
officer or other person may take into consideration the following, among other
pertinent factors:

(1) The severity of the violation or violations which
the child is reasonably believed to have committed;

(2) The frequency with which the child is reasonably
believed to have committed such or other violations;

(3) The child's age, character, physical, and mental
health;

(4) The interpersonal relationships between the
child, the family, and the community; and

(5) Any previous history of referrals to the court.
[L 1980, c 303, §4(3)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next